Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,102
Shares drawn by lot, when.

Unless the shares are allotted to their respective owners by the referee or referees as hereinbefore contemplated, the clerk shall number the shares and then draw the names of the future owners by lot.

R.S.1867, Code § 835, p. 541;

R.S.1913, § 8318;

C.S.1922, § 9270;

C.S.1929, § 20-21,102;

R.S.1943, § 25-21,102.

Unless specifically directed by the trial court, the shares may be drawn by lot. Trowbridge v. Donner, 152 Neb. 206, 40 N.W.2d 655 (1950).